California statutes. Penal Code
(b) If the defendant becomes mentally competent after a conservatorship has been established pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act, Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and Section 1370, the conservator shall certify that fact to the sheriff and district attorney of the county in which the defendant’s case is pending, defendant’s attorney of record, and the committing court.

(c) (1) When a defendant is returned to court with a certification that competence has been regained, including a certification of restoration provided pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court shall notify either the community program director, the county mental health director, the State Department of State Hospitals, or the regional center director and the Director of Developmental Services, as appropriate, of the date of any hearing on the defendant’s competence and whether or not the defendant was found by the court to have recovered competence.

(2) If the court rejects a certificate of restoration, the court shall base its rejection on a written report of an evaluation, conducted by a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist, that the defendant is not competent. The evaluation shall be conducted after the certificate of restoration is filed with the committing court and in compliance with Section
 1369. A copy of the written report shall be provided to the department pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370. The court shall also provide a copy of the court order or minute order rejecting the certification of restoration to the department, pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370, including any minute orders continuing the hearing for the court’s determination.

(d) If the committing court approves the certificate of restoration to competence as to a person in custody, the court shall notify the State Department of State Hospitals by providing the State Department of State Hospitals with a copy of the court order or minute order approving the certificate of restoration to competence. The court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the person is entitled to be admitted to bail or released on own recognizance status pending conclusion of the proceedings. If the
 superior court approves the certificate of restoration to competence regarding a person on outpatient status, unless it appears that the person has refused to come to court, that person shall remain released either on own recognizance status, or, in the case of a developmentally disabled person, either on the defendant’s promise or on the promise of a responsible adult to secure the person’s appearance in court for further proceedings. If the person has refused to come to court, the court shall set bail and may place the person in custody until bail is posted.

(e) (1) A defendant subject to either subdivision (a) or (b) who is not admitted to bail or released under subdivision (d) may, at the discretion of the court, and only upon the recommendation of the person or entity that issued the certification of restoration to competence, be returned to the hospital or facility of their original commitment or other appropriate
 secure facility approved by the community program director, the county mental health director, or the regional center director. If the recommendation was submitted by the State Department of State Hospitals, the defendant shall be placed at a facility described in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code at the discretion of, and as directed by, the department. The recommendation submitted to the court shall be based on the opinion that the person will need continued treatment in a hospital or treatment facility in order to maintain competence to stand trial or that placing the person in a jail environment would create a substantial risk that the person would again become incompetent to stand trial before criminal proceedings could be resumed or completed.

(2) Any return to treatment pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to the following procedures:

(A) The
 recommendation described in paragraph (1) shall include a recommendation as to whether an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medications should be extended or issued. The court shall review the recommendation in accordance with the procedure outlined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370, and determine if the grounds for authorization apply. If an order authorizing the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication already exists, the court may continue the order for no more than one year or may vacate the order. If an order does not exist, the court may issue an order for no more than one year. The court shall provide copies of the reports of the treating psychiatrist or psychiatrists and the defendant’s patients’ rights advocate or attorney, as applicable, to both the prosecutor and defense counsel.

(B) If an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication is not authorized by
 the court pursuant to subparagraph (A), the defendant’s treating psychiatrist, or medical director designee, may pursue an order in the manner outlined in subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370.

(C) If an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication is not renewed by the court pursuant to subparagraph (A), the district attorney, county counsel, or representative of any facility where a defendant is placed pursuant to paragraph (1) may petition the committing court for a renewal within 60 days before the expiration of the one-year involuntary medication order. The petition shall include the basis for involuntary medication set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370. Notice of the petition shall be provided to the defendant, the defendant’s attorney, and the district attorney. The court shall hear and determine whether the defendant
 continues to meet the criteria set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370. The court may renew the order for no more than one year. The court may review the petition and renew the order based on the petition. If the court has a hearing on the petition to renew an order for involuntary medication, the hearing shall be conducted prior to the expiration of the current order. The court may, for a period not to exceed 14 days, extend the involuntary medication order and continue the hearing pursuant to stipulation between the parties or upon a finding of good cause. In determining good cause, the court may review the petition filed with the court, and any additional testimony needed by the court, to determine if it is appropriate to continue medication beyond the expiration date and for a period of up to 14 days.

(D) Upon the determination by the medical director or designee of the State
 Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility to which the defendant is confined that the defendant no longer satisfies the criteria for continued treatment under this subdivision, the medical director or designee shall immediately certify that fact to the court by filing a written report containing those findings. The filing of the report shall automatically trigger the return of the defendant to county custody in the manner described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), if a defendant is returned by the court to a hospital or other facility for the purpose of maintaining competency to stand trial and that defendant is already under civil commitment to that hospital or facility from another county pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) or as a developmentally disabled person committed pursuant
 to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the costs of housing and treating the defendant in that facility following return pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be the responsibility of the original county of civil commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 32.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1373.

The expense of sending the defendant to the state hospital or other facility, and of bringing him or her back, are chargeable to the county in which the indictment was found, information was filed, or revocation proceeding was held; but the county may recover the expense from the estate of the defendant, if he or she has any, or from a relative, bound to provide for and maintain him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 759, Sec. 13.   (SB 1412)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1373.5.

In every case where a claim is presented to the county for money due under the provisions of section 1373 of this code, interest shall be allowed from the date of rejection, if rejected and recovery is finally had thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

1374.

When a defendant who has been found incompetent is on outpatient status under Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 and the outpatient treatment staff is of the opinion that the defendant has recovered competence, the supervisor shall communicate such opinion to the community program director. If the community program director concurs, that opinion shall be certified by such director to the committing court. The court shall calendar the case for further proceeding pursuant to Section 1372.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1232, Sec. 9.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1375.

Claims by the state for all amounts due from any county by reason of the provisions of Section 1373 of this code shall be processed and paid by the county pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 29700) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 263.)
-------------------------------------------

1375.5.

(a) Time spent by a person in a treatment facility or county jail as a result of proceedings under this chapter shall be credited against the sentence, if any, imposed in the underlying criminal case or revocation matter giving rise to the competency proceedings.

(b) As used in this section, “time spent in a treatment facility” includes days a person is treated as an outpatient pursuant to Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2.

(c) A person subject to this chapter shall receive credits pursuant to Section 4019 for all time during which he or she is confined in a county jail and for which he or she is otherwise eligible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1008, Sec. 4.   (SB 1187)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1376.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Intellectual disability” means the condition of significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior and manifested before the end of the developmental period, as defined by clinical standards.

(2) “Manifested before the end of the developmental period” means that the deficits were present during the developmental period. It does not require a formal diagnosis of intellectual disability, or tests of intellectual functioning in the intellectual disability range, before the end of the developmental
 period. 

(3) “Prima facie showing of intellectual disability” means that the defendant’s allegation of intellectual disability is based on the type of evidence typically relied on by a qualified expert in diagnosing intellectual disability, as defined in current clinical standards, or when a qualified expert provides a declaration diagnosing the defendant as a person with intellectual disability.

(4) “The prosecution” refers to the prosecuting agency at trial and to the respondent in a habeas corpus proceeding.

(b) A person with an intellectual disability is ineligible for the death penalty. 

(c) (1) When the prosecution seeks the death penalty, the defendant may, at a reasonable time prior to the commencement of trial, apply for an order directing that a hearing to determine intellectual disability be conducted. Upon a prima facie showing that the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability, the court shall order a hearing to determine whether the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability. At the request of the defendant, the court shall conduct the hearing without a jury prior to the commencement of the trial. The defendant’s request for a court hearing prior to trial shall constitute a waiver of a jury hearing on the issue of intellectual disability. If the defendant does not request a court hearing, the court shall order a jury hearing to determine if the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability. The jury hearing on
 intellectual disability shall occur at the conclusion of the phase of the trial in which the jury has found the defendant guilty with a finding that one or more of the special circumstances enumerated in Section 190.2 are true. Except as provided in paragraph (3), the same jury shall make a finding that the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability or that the defendant does not have an intellectual disability.

(2) For the purposes of the procedures set forth in this section, the court or jury shall decide only the question of the defendant’s intellectual disability. The defendant shall present evidence in support of the claim that they are a person with an intellectual disability. The prosecution shall present its case regarding the issue of whether the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability. Each party may offer
 rebuttal evidence. The court, for good cause in furtherance of justice, may permit either party to reopen its case to present evidence in support of or opposition to the claim of intellectual disability. A statement made by the defendant during an examination ordered by the court shall not be admissible in the trial on the defendant’s guilt.

(3) At the close of evidence, the prosecution shall make its final argument, and the defendant shall conclude with their final argument. The burden of proof shall be on the defense to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability. The jury shall return a verdict that either the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability or the defendant does not have an intellectual disability. The verdict of the jury shall be unanimous. When the jury is
 unable to reach a unanimous verdict that the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability, and does not reach a unanimous verdict that the defendant does not have an intellectual disability, the court shall dismiss the jury and enter a finding that the defendant is ineligible for the death penalty pursuant to this section.

(d) When the hearing is conducted before the court prior to the commencement of the trial, the following shall apply:

(1) If the court finds that the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability, the court shall preclude the death penalty and the criminal trial thereafter shall proceed as in any other case in which a sentence of death is not sought by the prosecution. If the defendant is found guilty of murder in the first degree, with a finding
 that one or more of the special circumstances enumerated in Section 190.2 are true, the court shall sentence the defendant to confinement in the state prison for life without the possibility of parole. The jury shall not be informed of the prior proceedings or the findings concerning the defendant’s claim of intellectual disability unless the defendant elects to present that information at trial.

(2) If the court finds that the defendant does not have an intellectual disability, the trial court shall proceed as in any other case in which a sentence of death is sought by the prosecution. The jury shall not be informed of the prior proceedings or the findings concerning the defendant’s claim of intellectual disability.

(e) When the hearing is conducted before the jury after the defendant
 is found guilty with a finding that one or more of the special circumstances enumerated in Section 190.2 are true, the following shall apply:

(1) If the jury finds that the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability, the court shall preclude the death penalty and shall sentence the defendant to confinement in the state prison for life without the possibility of parole.

(2) If the jury finds that the defendant does not have an intellectual disability, the trial shall proceed as in any other case in which a sentence of death is sought by the prosecution.

(f) When the defendant has not requested a court hearing as provided in subdivision (c), and has entered a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity under Sections
 190.4 and 1026, the hearing on intellectual disability shall occur at the conclusion of the sanity trial if the defendant is found sane.

(g) A person in custody pursuant to a judgment of death may apply for an order directing that a hearing to determine intellectual disability be conducted as part of a petition for a writ of habeas corpus. When the claim of intellectual disability is raised in a petition for habeas corpus and a petitioner makes a prima facie showing of intellectual disability, the reviewing court shall issue an order to show cause if the petitioner has met the prima facie standard. The petitioner bears the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner is a person with an intellectual disability. The
 prosecution may present its case regarding the issue of whether the petitioner is a person with an intellectual disability. Each party may offer rebuttal evidence. During an evidentiary hearing under this subdivision, an expert may testify about the contents of out-of-court statements, including documentary evidence and statements from witnesses when those types of statements are accepted by the medical community as relevant to a diagnosis of intellectual disability if the expert relied upon these statements as the basis for their
 opinion.

(h) The results of a test measuring intellectual functioning shall not be changed or adjusted based on race, ethnicity, national origin, or socioeconomic status.

(i) (1) When a court has concluded a hearing under this section is necessary, that court may order a defendant or petitioner to submit to testing by a qualified prosecution expert only if the prosecution presents a reasonable factual basis that the intellectual functioning testing presented by the defendant or petitioner is unreliable. Any order requiring the defendant or petitioner to submit to testing by a qualified prosecution expert shall be limited to tests directly related to the determination of the defendant or petitioner’s intellectual functioning. Any such order shall also prohibit
 the expert from questioning the defendant or petitioner about the facts of the case, shall permit the defendant or petitioner to have their attorney nearby during the examination and to consult with their attorney during the examination if they choose, and shall, upon request by the defendant or petitioner’s counsel, require that the prosecution expert’s examination be recorded in a manner agreed upon by the parties and the court.

(2) The prosecution shall submit a proposed list of the tests its expert wishes to administer so that the defendant or petitioner may raise any objections before testing is ordered. The Legislature finds and declares that this paragraph is declaratory of existing law. 

(j) Intellectual disability is a question of fact. The parties to a trial or habeas
 proceeding may stipulate that a defendant or petitioner is a person with intellectual disability as defined in clinical standards and in this section. After a prima facie showing of intellectual disability has been made, whenever the prosecution stipulates or concedes that the defendant or petitioner has an intellectual disability, the court shall accept the stipulation or concession unless it finds that the stipulation or concession is not supported by documentary evidence that provides a
 factual basis for concluding by a preponderance of the evidence that the person has an intellectual disability. If the court declines to accept a stipulation, it must state its factual and legal rationale for doing so on the record, and it may not rely upon facts or factors that are unrelated or irrelevant to the factual question of whether the defendant or petitioner has an intellectual disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 908, Sec. 2.   (SB 1001)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Compromising Certain Public Offenses by Leave of the Court [1377. - 1379.]

1377.

When the person injured by an act constituting a misdemeanor has a remedy by a civil action, the offense may be compromised, as provided in Section 1378, except when it is committed as follows:

(a) By or upon an officer of justice, while in the execution of the duties of his or her office.

(b) Riotously.

(c) With an intent to commit a felony.

(d) In violation of any court order as described in Section 273.6 or 273.65.

(e) By or upon any family or household member, or upon any person when the violation involves any person described in Section 6211 of the Family Code or subdivision (b) of Section 13700 of this code.

(f) Upon an elder, in violation of Section 368 of this code or Section 15656 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(g) Upon a child, as described in Section 647.6 or 11165.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1378.

If the person injured appears before the court in which the action is pending at any time before trial, and acknowledges that he has received satisfaction for the injury, the court may, in its discretion, on payment of the costs incurred, order all proceedings to be stayed upon the prosecution, and the defendant to be discharged therefrom; but in such case the reasons for the order must be set forth therein, and entered on the minutes. The order is a bar to another prosecution for the same offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

1379.

No public offense can be compromised, nor can any proceeding or prosecution for the punishment thereof upon a compromise be stayed, except as provided in this Chapter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Dismissal of the Action for Want of Prosecution or Otherwise [1381. - 1388.]

1381.

Whenever a defendant has been convicted, in any court of this state, of the commission of a felony or misdemeanor and has been sentenced to and has entered upon a term of imprisonment in a state prison or has been sentenced to and has entered upon a term of imprisonment in a county jail for a period of more than 90 days or has been committed to and placed in a county jail for more than 90 days as a condition of probation or has been committed to and placed in an institution subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority or whenever any person has been committed to the custody of the Director of Corrections pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and has entered upon his or her term of commitment, and at the time of the entry upon the term of imprisonment or commitment there is pending, in any court of this state, any other indictment, information, complaint, or any criminal proceeding wherein the defendant remains to be sentenced, the district attorney of the county in which the matters are pending shall bring the defendant to trial or for sentencing within 90 days after the person shall have delivered to said district attorney written notice of the place of his or her imprisonment or commitment and his or her desire to be brought to trial or for sentencing unless a continuance beyond the 90 days is requested or consented to by the person, in open court, and the request or consent entered upon the minutes of the court in which event the 90-day period shall commence to run anew from the date to which the consent or request continued the trial or sentencing. In the event that the defendant is not brought to trial or for sentencing within the 90 days the court in which the charge or sentencing is pending shall, on motion or suggestion of the district attorney, or of the defendant or person confined in the county jail or committed to the custody of the Director of Corrections or his or her counsel, or of the Department of Corrections, or of the Department of the Youth Authority, or on its own motion, dismiss the action. If a charge is filed against a person during the time the person is serving a sentence in any state prison or county jail of this state or while detained by the Director of Corrections pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or while detained in any institution subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority it is hereby made mandatory upon the district attorney of the county in which the charge is filed to bring it to trial within 90 days after the person shall have delivered to said district attorney written notice of the place of his or her imprisonment or commitment and his or her desire to be brought to trial upon the charge, unless a continuance is requested or consented to by the person, in open court, and the request or consent entered upon the minutes of the court, in which event the 90-day period shall commence to run anew from the date to which the request or consent continued the trial. In the event the action is not brought to trial within the 90 days the court in which the action is pending shall, on motion or suggestion of the district attorney, or of the defendant or person committed to the custody of the Director of Corrections or to a county jail or his or her counsel, or of the Department of Corrections, or of the Department of the Youth Authority, or on its own motion, dismiss the charge. The sheriff, custodian, or jailer shall endorse upon the written notice of the defendant’s desire to be brought to trial or for sentencing the cause of commitment, the date of commitment, and the date of release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

1381.5.

Whenever a defendant has been convicted of a crime and has entered upon a term of imprisonment therefor in a federal correctional institution located in this state, and at the time of entry upon such term of imprisonment or at any time during such term of imprisonment there is pending in any court of this state any criminal indictment, information, complaint, or any criminal proceeding wherein the defendant remains to be sentenced the district attorney of the county in which such matters are pending, upon receiving from such defendant a request that he be brought to trial or for sentencing, shall promptly inquire of the warden or other head of the federal correctional institution in which such defendant is confined whether and when such defendant can be released for trial or for sentencing. If an assent from authorized federal authorities for release of the defendant for trial or sentencing is received by the district attorney he shall bring him to trial or sentencing within 90 days after receipt of such assent, unless the federal authorities specify a date of release after 90 days, in which event the district attorney shall bring the prisoner to trial or sentencing at such specified time, or unless the defendant requests, in open court, and receives, or, in open court, consents to, a continuance, in which event he may be brought to trial or sentencing within 90 days from such request or consent.

If a defendant is not brought to trial or for sentencing as provided by this section, the court in which the action is pending shall, on motion or suggestion of the district attorney, or representative of the United States, or the defendant or his counsel, dismiss the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 1.1.)
-------------------------------------------

1382.

(a) The court, unless good cause to the contrary is shown, shall order the action to be dismissed in the following cases:

(1) When a person has been held to answer for a public offense and an information is not filed against that person within 15 days.

(2) In a felony case, when a defendant is not brought to trial within 60 days of the defendant’s arraignment on an indictment or information, or reinstatement of criminal proceedings pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2, or, in case the cause is to be tried again following a mistrial, an order granting a new trial from which an appeal is not taken, or an appeal from the
 superior court, within 60 days after the mistrial has been declared, after entry of the order granting the new trial, or after the filing of the remittitur in the trial court, or after the issuance of a writ or order which, in effect, grants a new trial, within 60 days after notice of the writ or order is filed in the trial court and served upon the prosecuting attorney, or within 90 days after notice of the writ or order is filed in the trial court and served upon the prosecuting attorney in any case where the district attorney chooses to resubmit the case for a preliminary examination after an appeal or the issuance of a writ reversing a judgment of conviction upon a plea of guilty prior to a preliminary hearing. However, an action shall not be dismissed under this paragraph if either of the following circumstances exists:

(A) The defendant enters a general waiver of the 60-day trial requirement. A general waiver of the 60-day trial
 requirement entitles the superior court to set or continue a trial date without the sanction of dismissal should the case fail to proceed on the date set for trial. If the defendant, after proper notice to all parties, later withdraws, in open court, his or her waiver in the superior court, the defendant shall be brought to trial within 60 days of the date of that withdrawal. Upon the withdrawal of a general time waiver in open court, a trial date shall be set and all parties shall be properly notified of that date. If a general time waiver is not expressly entered, subparagraph (B) shall apply.

(B) The defendant requests or consents to the setting of a trial date beyond the 60-day period. In the absence of an express general time waiver from the defendant, or upon the withdrawal of a general time waiver, the court shall set a trial date. Whenever a case is set for trial beyond the 60-day period by request or consent, expressed or implied, of
 the defendant without a general waiver, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the date set for trial or within 10 days thereafter.

Whenever a case is set for trial after a defendant enters either a general waiver as to the 60-day trial requirement or requests or consents, expressed or implied, to the setting of a trial date beyond the 60-day period pursuant to this paragraph, the court may not grant a motion of the defendant to vacate the date set for trial and to set an earlier trial date unless all parties are properly noticed and the court finds good cause for granting that motion.

(3) Regardless of when the complaint is filed, when a defendant in a misdemeanor or infraction case is not brought to trial within 30 days after he or she is arraigned or enters his or her plea, whichever occurs later, if the defendant is in custody at the time of arraignment or plea, whichever occurs later, or in
 all other cases, within 45 days after the defendant’s arraignment or entry of the plea, whichever occurs later, or in case the cause is to be tried again following a mistrial, an order granting a new trial from which no appeal is taken, or an appeal from a judgment in a misdemeanor or infraction case, within 30 days after the mistrial has been declared, after entry of the order granting the new trial, or after the remittitur is filed in the trial court, or within 30 days after the date of the reinstatement of criminal proceedings pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367). However, an action shall not be dismissed under this subdivision if any of the following circumstances exists:

(A) The defendant enters a general waiver of the 30-day or 45-day trial requirement. A general waiver of the 30-day or 45-day trial requirement entitles the court to set or continue a trial date without the sanction of dismissal should the case fail to
 proceed on the date set for trial. If the defendant, after proper notice to all parties, later withdraws, in open court, his or her waiver in the superior court, the defendant shall be brought to trial within 30 days of the date of that withdrawal. Upon the withdrawal of a general time waiver in open court, a trial date shall be set and all parties shall be properly notified of that date. If a general time waiver is not expressly entered, subparagraph (B) shall apply.

(B) The defendant requests or consents to the setting of a trial date beyond the 30-day or 45-day period. In the absence of an express general time waiver from the defendant, or upon the withdrawal of a general time waiver the court shall set a trial date. Whenever a case is set for trial beyond the 30-day or 45-day period by request or consent, expressed or implied, of the defendant without a general waiver, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the date set for trial or
 within 10 days thereafter.

(C) The defendant in a misdemeanor case has been ordered to appear on a case set for hearing prior to trial, but the defendant fails to appear on that date and a bench warrant is issued, or the case is not tried on the date set for trial because of the defendant’s neglect or failure to appear, in which case the defendant shall be deemed to have been arraigned within the meaning of this subdivision on the date of his or her subsequent arraignment on a bench warrant or his or her submission to the court.

(b) Whenever a defendant has been ordered to appear in superior court on a felony case set for trial or set for a hearing prior to trial after being held to answer, if the defendant fails to appear on that date and a bench warrant is issued, the defendant shall be brought to trial within 60 days after the defendant next appears in the superior court unless
 a trial date previously had been set which is beyond that 60-day period.

(c) If the defendant is not represented by counsel, the defendant shall not be deemed under this section to have consented to the date for the defendant’s trial unless the court has explained to the defendant his or her rights under this section and the effect of his or her consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1383.

If the defendant is not charged or tried, as provided in Section 1382, and sufficient reason therefor is shown, the court may order the action to be continued from time to time, and in the meantime may discharge the defendant from custody on his or her own undertaking of bail for his or her appearance to answer the charge at the time to which the action is continued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

1384.

If the judge or magistrate directs the action to be dismissed, the defendant must, if in custody, be discharged therefrom; or if admitted to bail, his bail is exonerated, or money deposited instead of bail must be refunded to him or to the person or persons found by the court to have deposited said money on behalf of said defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 938, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1385.

(a) The judge or magistrate may, either on motion of the court or upon the application of the prosecuting attorney, and in furtherance of justice, order an action to be dismissed. The reasons for the dismissal shall be stated orally on the record. The court shall also set forth the reasons in an order entered upon the minutes if requested by either party or in any case in which the proceedings are not being recorded electronically or reported by a court reporter. A dismissal shall not be made for any cause that would be ground of demurrer to the accusatory pleading.

(b) (1) If the court has the authority pursuant to subdivision (a) to strike or dismiss an enhancement, the court may instead strike the additional punishment for that enhancement in
 the furtherance of justice in compliance with subdivision (a).

(2) This subdivision does not authorize the court to strike the additional punishment for any enhancement that cannot be stricken or dismissed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the court shall dismiss an enhancement if it is in the furtherance of justice to do so, except if dismissal of that enhancement is prohibited by any initiative statute.

(2) In exercising its discretion under this subdivision, the court shall consider and afford great weight to evidence offered by the defendant to prove that any of the mitigating circumstances in subparagraphs (A) to (I) are present. Proof of the presence of one or more of these circumstances weighs greatly in favor of dismissing the enhancement, unless the
 court finds that dismissal of the enhancement would endanger public safety. “Endanger public safety” means there is a likelihood that the dismissal of the enhancement would result in physical injury or other serious danger to others.

(A) Application of the enhancement would result in a discriminatory racial impact as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 745.

(B) Multiple enhancements are alleged in a single case. In this instance, all enhancements beyond a single enhancement shall be dismissed.

(C) The application of an enhancement could result in a sentence of over 20 years. In this instance, the enhancement shall be dismissed.

(D) The current offense is connected to mental illness.

(E) The current offense is connected to prior victimization or childhood trauma.

(F) The current offense is not a violent felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(G) The defendant was a juvenile when they committed the current offense or any prior offenses, including criminal convictions and juvenile adjudications, that trigger the enhancement or enhancements applied in the current case.

(H) The enhancement is based on a prior conviction that is over five years old.

(I) Though a firearm was used in the current offense, it was inoperable or unloaded.

(3) While the court may exercise its discretion at sentencing, this
 subdivision does not prevent a court from exercising its discretion before, during, or after trial or entry of plea.

(4) The circumstances listed in paragraph (2) are not exclusive and the court maintains authority to dismiss or strike an enhancement in accordance with subdivision (a).
